Arkansas, session 2025, HB1437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-14-133 is repealed.
5-14-133. Registered offender prohibited from entering a water park
owned or operated by a local government.
(a) As used in this section, “water park” means a recreational aquatic
facility that has among its features a swimming pool, wave pool, splash pad,
water slide, or other area dedicated to aquatic activities for children and
is open to the general public.
(b) It is unlawful for a person who is required to register under the
Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq., and who has been
assessed as a Level 3 or Level 4 offender to knowingly enter a water park
owned or operated by a local government.
(c) A violation of this section is a Class D felony.

*CEB136*
02/10/2025 12:59:49 PM CEB136

HB1437
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-14-134 is amended to read as follows:
5-14-134. Registered offender prohibited from entering a water park,
swimming area, or children's playground contained within an Arkansas State
Park a public park.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Arkansas State Park” means a state park classified or
reclassified as an official state park under § 22-4-201(1) or § 22-4-202;
(2) “Children's playground” means a place with a specific design
for children to be able to play there, whether indoor or outdoor; and
(2)(A) “Public park” means any property owned or maintained by
this state or a county, city, town, or political subdivision in this state
for the recreational use of the public.
(B) “Public park” includes without limitation the portion
of any privately owned land over which an easement has been granted to the
state or a county, city, town, or political subdivision and that is used as
part of the public park system of the state or a county, city, or town;
(3) “Swimming area” means a place with a specific design for
people to swim, including without limitation a beach, a swimming pool, and a
water park.; and
(4) “Water park” means a recreational aquatic facility that has
among its features a swimming pool, wave pool, splash pad, water slide, or
other area dedicated to aquatic activities for children and is open to the
general public.
(b) It is unlawful for a person who is required to register under the
Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq., and who has been
assessed as a Level 3 or Level 4 offender to knowingly enter a within one
hundred feet (100') of a water park, swimming area, or children's playground
contained within an Arkansas State Park a public park.
(c) A violation of this section is a Class D felony.







02/10/2025 12:59:49 PM CEB136